Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [125A.421] NOTICE OF PROCEDURAL SAFEGUARDS; TRANSLATION. new text end new text begin The Department of Education must develop and maintain an oral translation of the notice for procedural safeguards provided to a parent or guardian of a child with a disability. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end